Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4108.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of water resources; retirement of irrigation grandfathered rights; fiscal year 2026-2027; exemption A. The sum of $50,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of water resources to compensate irrigation grandfathered rights holders for the permanent retirement or reduction of the holder's water duty. B. On or before December 31, 2026, the director of the department of water resources shall begin purchasing and retiring irrigation grandfathered rights, including conservation agreements that result in irrigation grandfathered rights holders permanently reducing their annual allotments. C. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.